Massachusetts, session 194th, H896.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 33 of chapter 92 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following 2 
paragraphs:- 
The division shall, on Long island within Boston harbor, establish as land of the 
commonwealth, the Long island reservation for the purposes of park land, passive recreational 
use and the preservation of open space and conservation land to protect the coastal beaches, 
palustrine wetlands, estuarine intertidal wetlands, marine intertidal wetlands and salt marsh, and 
to provide a habitat for native oysters and other local shellfish. The reservation shall create an 
accessible park for the public with ocean shoreline and shall remain listed in the state register of 
historic places.  

of 2 11  The division shall, on Moon island within Quincy bay, establish as land of the 
commonwealth, the Moon island reservation for the purposes of park land, passive recreational 
use and the preservation of open space and conservation land to protect the coastal beaches, 
palustrine wetlands, estuarine intertidal wetlands, marine intertidal wetlands and salt marsh, and 
to provide a habitat for native oysters and other local shellfish.  
SECTION 2. Not later than June 30, 2027, the department of capital asset and 
maintenance, on behalf of the division of state parks and recreation in the department of 
conservation and recreation shall take in fee, pursuant to chapter 79 of the General Laws, the 
land mass encompassing the islands known as Long island and Moon island in the city of 
Boston; provided, however, that the department shall enter into leases for certain properties 
currently used for recreational purposes and rehabilitative facilities. The lands shall be taken 
pursuant to Article XCVII of the amendments to the Constitution for the public benefit of the 
commonwealth and Long island and Moon island are hereby declared reservation lands of the 
commonwealth pursuant to chapter 92 of the General Laws.